Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE J. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 723. TEXAS TRAFFIC SAFETY ACT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 723.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Texas Traffic Safety Act.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 723.002. GOVERNMENTAL PURPOSE. The establishment, development, and maintenance of a traffic safety program is a vital governmental purpose and function of the state and its legal and political subdivisions.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 723.003. TRAFFIC SAFETY FUND ACCOUNT. (a) The traffic safety fund account is an account in the general revenue fund. Money received from any source to implement this chapter shall be:

(1) deposited to the credit of the traffic safety fund account; and

(2) spent with other state money spent to implement this chapter in the manner in which the other state money is spent.

(b) A payment from the traffic safety fund account shall be made in compliance with this chapter and rules adopted by the governor.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.162, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER B. PREPARATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF TRAFFIC SAFETY PROGRAM

Sec. 723.011. GOVERNOR'S RESPONSIBILITY FOR PROGRAM. (a) The governor shall:

(1) prepare and administer a statewide traffic safety program designed to reduce traffic collisions and the death, injury, and property damage that result from traffic collisions;

(2) adopt rules for the administration of this chapter, including rules, procedures, and policy statements governing grants-in-aid and contractual relations;

(3) receive on the state's behalf for the implementation of this chapter money made available by the United States under federal law; and

(4) allocate money appropriated by the legislature in the General Appropriations Act to implement this chapter.

(b) In preparing and administering the traffic safety program, the governor may:

(1) cooperate with the United States or a legal or political subdivision of the state in research designed to aid in traffic safety;

(2) accept federal money available for research relating to traffic safety; and

(3) employ personnel necessary to administer this chapter.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 709 (H.B. 2190), Sec. 102, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 723.012. TRAFFIC SAFETY PROGRAM. The statewide traffic safety program must include:

(1) a driver education and training program administered by the governor through appropriate agencies that complies with Section 723.013;

(2) plans for improving:

(A) driver licensing;

(B) collision records;

(C) vehicle inspection, registration, and titling;

(D) traffic engineering;

(E) personnel;

(F) police traffic supervision;

(G) traffic courts;

(H) highway design; and

(I) uniform traffic laws; and

(3) plans for local traffic safety programs by legal and political subdivisions of this state that may be implemented if the programs:

(A) are approved by the governor; and

(B) conform with uniform standards adopted under the Highway Safety Act of 1966 (23 U.S.C. Sec. 401 et seq.).

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 709 (H.B. 2190), Sec. 103, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 723.013. DRIVER EDUCATION AND TRAINING PROGRAM. (a) The statewide driver education and training program required by Section 723.012 shall provide for:

(1) rules that permit controlled innovation and experimentation and that set minimum standards for:

(A) classroom instruction;

(B) driving skills training;

(C) instructor qualifications;

(D) program content; and

(E) supplementary materials and equipment;

(2) a method for continuing evaluation of approved driver education and training programs to identify the practices most effective in preventing traffic collisions; and

(3) contracts between the governing bodies of centrally located independent school districts or other appropriate public or private agencies and the state to provide approved driver education and training programs.

(b) Instruction offered under a contract authorized by this section must be offered to any applicant who is over 15 years of age.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 709 (H.B. 2190), Sec. 104, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 723.014. COOPERATION OF STATE AGENCIES, OFFICERS, AND EMPLOYEES. On the governor's request, a state agency or institution, state officer, or state employee shall cooperate in an activity of the state that is consistent with:

(1) this chapter; and

(2) the agency's, institution's, officer's, or employee's official functions.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 723.015. PARTICIPATION IN PROGRAM BY LEGAL OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION. A legal or political subdivision of this state may:

(1) cooperate and contract with the state, another legal or political subdivision of this state, or a private person in establishing, developing, and maintaining a statewide traffic safety program;

(2) spend money from any source for an activity related to performing a part of the traffic safety program; and

(3) contract and pay for a personal service or property to be used in the traffic safety program or for an activity related to the program.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER C. GIFTS, GRANTS, DONATIONS, GRANTS-IN-AID, AND PAYMENTS

Sec. 723.031. GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. To implement this chapter, the state may accept and spend a gift, grant, or donation of money or other property from a private source.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 723.032. GRANTS-IN-AID AND CONTRACTUAL PAYMENTS. (a) A grant-in-aid for a governmental purpose or a contractual payment may be made to a legal or political subdivision of this state to carry out a duty or activity that is part of the statewide traffic safety program.

(b) To implement this chapter, a contractual payment may be made from money in the traffic safety fund account for a service rendered or property furnished by a private person or an agency that is not a legal or political subdivision of this state.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.162, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.